Virginia statutes. Title 45.1. Mines and Mining.
§§ 45.1-1 through 45.1-400.

Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to Mines and Min ing, see Title 45.2 (§

45.2-100

et seq.).

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 repealed and recodified former

Titles 45.1

and 67 as Title 45.2. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

At its 1966 session the General Assembly, by Acts 1966, c. 594, repealed Title 45 and enacted in its place a new Title 45.1, comprising Chapters 1 (§ 45.1-1.1 et seq.) through 14 (§ 45.1-158 et seq.). Former Chapter 15 (§§ 45.1-162 through 45.1-179), also enacted at the 1966 session of the General Assembly, was codified in this title by the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 1984, c. 590, which added Article 1 of Chapter 1 and Chapters 25 and 26 and enacted, amended, and repealed other sections of Title 45.1, are effective Jan. 1, 1985.

Chapters 1 through 14 of Title 45.1 were previously repealed by Acts 1994, c. 28.